Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1742YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 10 Section 1. Section 275.55, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. The attachment is effective July 1 following its approval 3 in the calendar year immediately subsequent to the calendar 4 year in which the attachment was approved . If the dissolution 5 proposal is for the dissolution of a school district with a 6 certified enrollment of fewer than six hundred, the territory 7 located in the school district that dissolved is eligible, if 8 approved by the director of the department of education, for 9 a reduction in the foundation property tax levy under section 10 257.3, subsection 1 . If the director approves a reduction in 11 the foundation property tax levy as provided in this section , 12 the director shall notify the director of the department of 13 management of the reduction. 14 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to propositions 15 that are approved by voters pursuant to section 275.55 on or 16 after the effective date of this Act. 17